test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-tuekk41_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tükk: # Noun (41) tükk 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tükk+N+Sg+Nom: tükk
     tükk+N+Sg+Gen: tükü
     tükk+N+Sg+Par: tükkü
     tükk+N+Sg+Ill: tükkü
     tükk+N+Sg+Ine: [tükün, tüküh, tükühn]
     tükk+N+Sg+Ela: tüküst
     tükk+N+Sg+All: tüküle
     tükk+N+Sg+Ade: tükül
     tükk+N+Sg+Abl: tükült
     tükk+N+Sg+Tra: tüküs
     tükk+N+Sg+Ter: tüküniq
     tükk+N+Sg+Abe: tüküldäq
     tükk+N+Sg+Com: tükügaq
     tükk+N+Pl+Nom: tüküq
     tükk+N+Pl+Gen: [tükke, tükkä]
     tükk+N+Pl+Par: [tükke, tükkä]
     tükk+N+Pl+Ill: [tükkehe, tükke, tükkede, tükkähe, tükkä, tükkäde]
     tükk+N+Pl+Ine: [tüken, tükeh, tükehn, tükän, tükäh, tükähn]
     tükk+N+Pl+Ela: [tükest, tükäst]
     tükk+N+Pl+All: [tükele, tükäle]
     tükk+N+Pl+Ade: [tükel, tükäl]
     tükk+N+Pl+Abl: [tükelt, tükält]
     tükk+N+Pl+Tra: [tükes, tükäs]
     tükk+N+Pl+Ter: [tükeniq, tükäniq]
     tükk+N+Pl+Abe: [tükeldäq, tükäldäq]
     tükk+N+Pl+Com: [tükkegaq, tükkägaq]
